Utah statutes.
11-42-203.   Protests.
(1)  An owner of property that is proposed to be assessed within an assessment
area may, within the time specified in the notice under Section 11-42-202,
file a written protest against:
(a)  the designation of the assessment area;
(b)  the inclusion of the owner's property in the proposed assessment area;
(c)  the proposed improvements to be acquired or constructed; or
(d)  any other aspect of the proposed designation of an assessment area.
(2)  Each protest under Subsection (1)(a) shall describe or otherwise identify
the property owned by the person filing the protest.
(3)  An owner may withdraw a protest at any time before the conclusion of the
hearing under Section 11-42-204 by filing a written withdrawal with the
governing body.
(4)  If the governing body intends to assess property within the proposed
assessment area by type of improvement or by zone, the governing body shall,
in determining whether adequate protests have been filed, aggregate the
protests by the type of improvement or by zone.
(5)  The failure of an owner of property within the proposed assessment area
to file a timely written protest constitutes a waiver of any objection to:
(a)  the designation of the assessment area;
(b)  any improvement to be provided to property within the assessment area;
and
(c)  the inclusion of the owner's property within the assessment area.
